Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 SF 259 (4) 91 th/ns/mb S.F. 259 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.11B Disclosure of information 1 prohibited ââ out-of-state traffic camera violations. 2 1. A person who requests personal information from the 3 department, a local authority, or a law enforcement agency by 4 presenting a registration plate number shall affirm the reason 5 for the request, subject to penalty for perjury. 6 2. Notwithstanding section 321.11, subsections 1, 2, 7 and 3, the department, a local authority, and any officer 8 or employee of a law enforcement agency shall not release 9 personal information of a person who was issued a driverâs 10 license by the department or who has a motor vehicle registered 11 in this state, if the release of such information would be 12 used to issue or collect a fine for a violation of a traffic 13 law observed by a traffic camera outside of this state. 14 This subsection does not prohibit the release of personal 15 information if the requester is investigating criminal or civil 16 law violations other than traffic law violations captured by 17 a traffic camera. 18 3. As used in this section: 19 a. âPersonâ means as defined in section 4.1. 20 b. âPersonal informationâ means as defined in section 21 321.11. 22 c. âTraffic cameraâ means a camera or other optical device 23 designed to detect and record motor vehicles being operated in 24 violation of a traffic law, including a violation for failure 25 to obey an official traffic-control signal, for excessive 26 speed, and for failure to pay a required toll, the use of which 27 results in the issuance or collection of a fine. 28 4. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 29 administer this section. 30 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 31 2026. 32 -1- SF 259 (4) 91 th/ns/mb 1/ 1